Colorado, session 2026A, HB1363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-201.1, amend
(1)(d)(XXVII) introductory portion and (1)(d)(XXVII)(A); and add
(1)(d)(XXVIII) as follows:
24-75-201.1. Restriction on state appropriations - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(1) (d) For each fiscal year, unrestricted general fund year-end
balances must be retained as a reserve in the following amounts:
(XXVII) For the fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter,
fifteen THE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, THIRTEEN percent of the amount
appropriated for expenditure from the general fund for that fiscal year
minus:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(A) The amount calculated by the state treasurer in accordance with
section 10-16-1206 (1.5)(a)(II)(B); except that this subsection
(1)(d)(XXVII)(A) takes effect on January 1, 2026, only if the condition
specified in section 10-16-1209 (1) occurs; and
(XXVIII) FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28, AND EACH OF THE FISCAL
YEARS THEREAFTER, FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR
EXPENDITURE FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR MINUS:
(A) THE AMOUNT CALCULATED BY THE STATE TREASURER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 10-16-1206 (1.5)(a)(II)(B); AND
(B) SO LONG AS THE ESCROW MONEY IS NOT RELEASED AS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 23-40-107, FORTY-ONE MILLION TWO HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND
DOLLARS. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d)(XXVIII)(B), "ESCROW
MONEY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 23-40-107 (2)(c).
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1363

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1363